Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.310

Persons rendering emergency care or transportation—Definitions.

For the purposes of RCW 4.24.300 the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Compensation" has its ordinary meaning but does not include: Nominal payments, reimbursement for expenses, or pension benefits; payments made to volunteer part-time and volunteer on-call personnel of fire departments, fire districts, ambulance districts, police departments, or any emergency response organizations; or any payment to a person employed as a transit operator who is paid for his or her regular work, which work does not routinely include providing emergency care or emergency transportation.

(2) "Emergency care" means care, first aid, treatment, or assistance rendered to the injured person in need of immediate medical attention and includes providing or arranging for further medical treatment or care for the injured person. Except with respect to the injured person or persons being transported for further medical treatment or care, the immunity granted by RCW 4.24.300 does not apply to the negligent operation of any motor vehicle.

(3) "Scene of an emergency" means the scene of an accident or other sudden or unexpected event or combination of circumstances which calls for immediate action.

[ 1989 c 223 s 1; 1987 c 212 s 501; 1985 c 443 s 20; 1975 c 58 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 443: See notes following RCW 7.69.010.

Infectious disease testing availability: RCW 70.05.180.